New Jersey, session 222, A302.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  Receipts from sales of the following baby products shall be exempt from the tax imposed under the Sales and Use Tax Act, P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-1 et seq.): (1)   cribs; (2)   child restraint systems; (3)   nursing bottles, nipples, and funnels; and (4)   strollers. b.    As used in this section: Child restraint system means any device that is designed to protect, hold, or restrain an infant while riding in a motor vehicle to prevent or minimize injury and conforms with federal motor vehicle safety standards. Crib means a bed or containment designed to accommodate an infant. Stroller means a non-motorized, wheeled vehicle designed to push or otherwise transport an infant including, but not limited to, a carriage, folding-type umbrella stroller, or full-size stroller. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.